Arkansas, session 2025, HB1303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 29 — Sustainable Aviation Fuel Incentive Act

26-51-2901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Sustainable
Aviation Fuel Incentive Act".

26-51-2902. Definitions.
*CEB021*
04-01-2025 10:54:12 CEB021

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/17/25 S4/1/25 HB1303
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Incentive agreement" means an agreement entered into by a
business and the Arkansas Economic Development Commission to provide the
business an incentive to locate a new qualified sustainable aviation fuel
project in the state;
(2)(A) “New full-time permanent employee” means a position or
job that:
(i) Is created pursuant to an executed incentive
agreement;
(ii) Is filled by one (1) or more employees or
contractual employees who:
(a) Were Arkansas taxpayers during the year in
which the tax credits or incentives were earned;
(b)(1) Work at or fill a position dedicated to
the qualified sustainable aviation fuel project identified in the incentive
agreement.
(2) A new employee of the business that
enters into the incentive agreement under this subchapter who does not work
at the qualified sustainable aviation fuel project may be counted if the new
employee:
(A) Otherwise meets the definition
of a new full-time permanent employee;
(B) Is subject to the Arkansas
Income Tax Withholding Act of 1965, § 26-51-901 et seq.;
(C) Is paid an average annual
salary of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); and
(D) Is verified by reports and methods established
as required by the incentive agreement; and
(c)(1) Are not employees hired by a qualified
manufacturer of sustainable aviation fuel before the date the incentive
agreement was executed unless:
(A) The position or job filled by
the existing employee was created in accordance with the incentive agreement;
and
(B) The position vacated by the
existing employee was either filled by a subsequent employee or no subsequent
04-01-2025 10:54:12 CEB021

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/17/25 S4/1/25 HB1303
employee will be hired because the qualified manufacturer of sustainable
aviation fuel no longer conducts the particular business activity requiring
that classification.
(2) If the Director of the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
find that a significant impairment of Arkansas job opportunities for existing
employees will otherwise occur, they may jointly authorize the counting of
existing employees as new full-time permanent employees; and
(iii) Has been filled for at least twenty-six (26)
consecutive weeks with an average of at least thirty (30) hours worked per
week.
(B) “New full-time permanent employee” includes a
contractual employee who works at the qualified sustainable aviation fuel
project identified in the incentive agreement only if the contractual
employee is offered a benefits package comparable to a direct employee of the
qualified manufacturer of sustainable aviation fuel seeking incentives under
this subchapter;
(3) "Qualified manufacturer of sustainable aviation fuel" means
a taxpayer who:
(A) Is a natural person, a company, or a corporation that
is engaged in the manufacture, refinement, or processing of sustainable
aviation fuel in this state;
(B) Uses more than eighty percent (80%) of the electricity
and natural gas consumed in the manufacture, refinement, or processing of
sustainable aviation fuel to provide power for reactors, distillation
columns, heaters, pumps, compressors, coolers, and other sustainable aviation
fuel production and processing equipment; and
(C) Has an incentive agreement;
(4) "Qualified sustainable aviation fuel project" means a
facility located in the state that:
(A) Manufactures sustainable aviation fuel;
(B) Has an installed facility cost of more than two
billion dollars ($2,000,000,000), as verified by the commission;
(C) Will employ seventy-five (75) or more new full-time
permanent employees; and
(D) Begins construction on or before December 31, 2027;
04-01-2025 10:54:12 CEB021

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/17/25 S4/1/25 HB1303
(5) "Sustainable aviation fuel" means kerosene-type jet fuel
derived from wood biomass; and
(6)(A) "Sustainable aviation fuel production and processing
equipment" means machinery and equipment that are essential for the
receiving, storing, processing, and testing of raw materials used in
producing or processing sustainable aviation fuel or the production, storage,
testing, and shipping of a finished product of a qualified sustainable
aviation fuel project, or both.
(B) "Sustainable aviation fuel production and processing
equipment" does not include a motor vehicle.

26-51-2903. Qualified manufacturer of sustainable aviation fuel
credit.
(a)(1) There is allowed an income tax credit against the income tax
imposed by this chapter in an amount equal to thirty percent (30%) of the
cost of sustainable aviation fuel production and processing equipment
purchased for use in the state by a qualified manufacturer of sustainable
aviation fuel that has:
(A) Obtained a certification from the Director of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission certifying to the Department of
Finance and Administration that the qualified manufacturer of sustainable
aviation fuel:
(i) Operates a qualified sustainable aviation fuel
project or has a qualified sustainable aviation fuel project in production;
and
(ii) Has invested more than two billion dollars
($2,000,000,000) after the effective date of this act in a qualified
sustainable aviation fuel project for:
(a) Property purchased for use in the
construction of one (1) or more buildings or an addition or improvement to a
building to be used for producing sustainable aviation fuel;
(b) Machinery and equipment located in or used
in connection with the qualified sustainable aviation fuel project, excluding
motor vehicles that are subject to registration; or
(c) Project planning costs or construction
labor costs, including without limitation:
04-01-2025 10:54:12 CEB021

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/17/25 S4/1/25 HB1303
(1) On-site direct labor and supervision
whether employed by a contractor or the owner of the qualified sustainable
aviation fuel project;
(2) Architectural fees or engineering
fees, or both;
(3) Right-of-way purchases;
(4) Utility extensions;
(5) Site preparation;
(6) Parking lots;
(7) Disposal or containment systems;
(8) Water and sewer treatment systems;
(9) Rail spurs;
(10) Streets and roads;
(11) Purchase of mineral rights;
(12) Land;
(13) Buildings;
(14) Building renovation and demolition;
(15) Production, processing, and testing
equipment;
(16) Freight charges;
(17) Material handling equipment;
(18) Drainage systems;
(19) Water tanks and reservoirs;
(20) Storage facilities;
(21) Equipment rental;
(22) Contractors' cost plus fees;
(23) Builders' risk insurance;
(24) Original spare parts;
(25) Job administrative expenses;
(26) Office furnishings and equipment;
(27) Rolling stock;
(28) Capitalized start-up costs as
recognized by generally accepted accounting principles; and
(29) Other costs related to the
construction of the qualified sustainable aviation fuel project;
(B) Obtained a certification from the Secretary of the
04-01-2025 10:54:12 CEB021

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/17/25 S4/1/25 HB1303
Department of Energy and Environment certifying to the Department of Finance
and Administration that:
(i) The qualified manufacturer of sustainable
aviation fuel is engaged in the business of manufacturing, producing,
refining, or processing sustainable aviation fuel; and
(ii) The machinery and equipment purchased are
sustainable aviation fuel production and processing equipment;
(C) Received a positive cost-benefit analysis, including
without limitation an analysis of other incentives offered by the State of
Arkansas with respect to the qualified sustainable aviation fuel project
subject to the income tax credit, as certified by the Director of the
Arkansas Economic Development Commission in consultation with the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State; and
(D) An incentive agreement with performance criteria and
claw-back provisions as required under subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The income tax credit allowed for a qualified manufacturer
of sustainable aviation fuel under this section shall not exceed the lesser
of the amount:
(A) Certified by the Department of Energy and Environment
under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section; or
(B) Provided in the incentive agreement for the qualified
sustainable aviation fuel project.
(3) The amount of the income tax credit under this section that
may be claimed by the taxpayer in a tax year shall not exceed the amount of
income tax due by the taxpayer.
(b) Any unused income tax credit under this section that cannot be
claimed in a tax year may be carried forward indefinitely.
(c) The issuance of an income tax credit allowed under this section is
subject to an incentive agreement with performance criteria and claw-back
provisions between a taxpayer and the Arkansas Economic Development
Commission that:
(1)(A) Is subject to the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State to ensure that the cost-benefit analysis required under subdivision
(a)(1)(C) of this section is met and maintained for a test period that is the
longer of the life of the income tax credits or twelve (12) years, subject to
the limitation stated in subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section.
04-01-2025 10:54:12 CEB021

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H3/17/25 S4/1/25 HB1303
(B) The test period described in subdivision (c)(1)(A) of
this section shall not be longer than fifteen (15) years; and
(2) Includes without limitation the:
(A) Capital investment for the qualified sustainable
aviation fuel project;
(B) New full-time permanent employee positions created by
the qualified sustainable aviation fuel project;
(C) Annual salary requirements for the new full-time
permanent employee positions created by the qualified sustainable aviation
fuel project;
(D) Timeline for fulfilling the investment and job
creation targets stated in the performance criteria and claw-back agreement
for the qualified sustainable aviation fuel project; and
(E) Conditions for the claw-back provisions, which are
triggered if, during the test period stated in subdivision (c)(1) of this
section, the taxpayer:
(i) Does not meet the required targets of the
qualified sustainable aviation fuel project related to capital investment,
job creation, timeline, or annual salary amounts; or
(ii) Fails to maintain a positive cost-benefit
analysis.

26-51-2904. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, the
Secretary of the Department of Commerce, and the Secretary of the Department
of Energy and Environment may promulgate rules to implement and administer
this subchapter.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective for tax
years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

/s/Jean




04-01-2025 10:54:12 CEB021